Tennessee, session 114, SB0527.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 43, Chapter 8, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) The manufacturer or seller of a pesticide registered with the commissioner in
accordance with § 43-8-104 and with the federal environmental protection agency (EPA)
under the federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act (FIFRA) (7 U.S.C. §136 et
seq.), is not liable in a civil action related to the labeling of the pesticide, including a
products liability action alleging a failure to warn under title 29, chapter 28, if the
pesticide bore a label approved by the EPA under FIFRA at the time of sale.
(b) This section does not apply if a pesticide is manufactured or sold in violation
of this chapter or FIFRA.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0527
001914
- 1 -